Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2028
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Corporate name.

(1) A corporate name:

(a) Shall contain the word corporation, incorporated, company,
or limited, or the abbreviation corp., inc., co., or ltd., or words or abbreviations
of like import in another language, except that a corporation organized to
conduct a banking business under the Nebraska Banking Act may use a name which
includes the word bank without using any such words or abbreviations; and

(b) Shall not contain language stating or implying that the
corporation is organized for a purpose other than that permitted by section
21-2024 and its articles of incorporation.

(2) Except as authorized by subsections (3) and (4) of this
section, a corporate name shall not be the same as or deceptively similar
to, upon the records of the Secretary of State, any of the names referenced
in subdivisions (2)(a) through (f) of this section:

(a) The corporate name of a corporation incorporated or authorized
to transact business in this state;

(b) A corporate name reserved or registered under section
21-2029 or 21-2030;

(c) The fictitious name adopted by a foreign corporation authorized
to transact business in this state because its real name is unavailable;

(d) The corporate name of a not-for-profit corporation incorporated
or authorized to transact business in this state;

(e) A trade name registered in this state pursuant to sections
87-208 to 87-219.01; and

(f) Any other business entity name registered or filed with
the Secretary of State pursuant to Nebraska law.

(3) A corporation may apply to the Secretary of State for
authorization to use a name that is deceptively similar to, upon his or her
records, one or more of the names described in subsection (2) of this section.
The Secretary of State shall authorize use of the name applied for if:

(a) The other corporation or business entity consents to the
use in writing; or

(b) The applicant delivers to the Secretary of State a certified
copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing
the applicant's right to use the name applied for in this state.

(4) A corporation may use the name, including the fictitious
name, of another domestic or foreign corporation or business entity that is
used in this state if the other corporation or business entity is incorporated
or authorized to transact business in this state and the proposed user corporation
has:

(a) Merged with the other corporation or business entity;

(b) Been formed by reorganization of the other corporation
or business entity; or

(c) Acquired all or substantially all of the assets, including
the name, of the other corporation or business entity.

(5) The Business Corporation Act shall not be construed to
control the use of fictitious names.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 28;

Laws 1997, LB 44, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 453, § 3;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 76;

Laws 2003, LB 464, § 4;

Laws 2011, LB462, § 3.

Nebraska Banking Act, see section 8-101.01.